Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1913
Public examiner, defined.

Public examiner shall mean an examiner who performs or purports to perform the service of attempting to verify truthfulness or detect deception or providing a diagnostic opinion regarding such truthfulness or deception exclusively in his or her official capacity as a salaried employee of some agency or political subdivision of the state.

Laws 1980, LB 485, § 13.